Student Transportation The St. Lucie County School District operates an effective student transportation system.
However, it can increase transportation revenues by seeking Medicaid reimbursement and decrease costs by taking steps to reduce bus vandalism.
Conclusion
_____________________________________________________
The St. Lucie County School District's transportation department is generally effective in providing school-related transportation, and it is using 17 of the 20 best practices in this area.
However, the district can improve transportation efficiency by examining opportunities to improve bus routing, documenting the need for students to ride specialized buses, and examining outsourcing opportunities.
In addition, the district could bring in additional revenue by billing Medicaid for eligible transportation services.
During the course of this review, OPPAGA identified a number of district accomplishments in the student transportation, some of which are included in Exhibit 12-1 below.
Exhibit 12-1
The District Has Had Notable Accomplishments in Student Transportation in the Last Three Years · · · · The district has an innovative program that allows the district to eliminate routine oil changes.
As the result of a route audit conducted in May 2001, the school board approved going to a three-tiered bus routing system, which allowed it to reduce the number of bus routes.
The district reduced the number of ineligible riders for school year 2002-03.
The district has developed goals, measurable objectives, and associated strategies for its transportation program.
Source: St. Lucie County School District.
Overview of Chapter Findings
____________________________
OPPAGA reviewed the district's student transportation using the Best Financial Management Practices adopted by the Commissioner of Education and associated indicators.
OPPAGA used several methodologies to develop chapter conclusions and action plans.
For instance, on-site interviews with district-level managers were conducted and information was gathered from such sources as the district's student transportation activities, policies, and procedures.
To receive additional input, OPPAGA interviewed district-level employees, route coordinators, bus drivers, shop foremen, principals, and teachers.
Questions varied depending on the groups interviewed with their answers incorporated into this chapter where applicable.
An overview of chapter findings is presented below.
OPPAGA
12-1
Student Transportation Transportation Services 1.
The district improved the efficiency of its transportation function by discontinuing services to students that are not eligible for state funding and who can safely walk to school and by lengthening the distance between bus stops.
However, it needs to develop a policy defining unsafe walking conditions and continue to review ways to reduce transportation routing costs.
(Page 12-6) 2.
The district ensures that all regular school bus routes and activity trips operate in accord with established routines and safely and promptly handles most unexpected contingencies affecting those operations.
However, the district experiences problems caused by bus driver absenteeism.
Additionally, district schools do not pay the full costs of transportation services for field trips.
(Page 12-13) 3.
The district effectively and efficiently recruits and retains the bus drivers and attendants it needs.
(Page 12-16) 4.
The district trains, supervises, and assists bus drivers to enable them to meet bus driving standards and maintain acceptable student discipline on the bus.
(Page 12-19) 5.
The district provides student transportation services for exceptional students in a coordinated fashion that minimizes hardships to students.
However, exceptional education employees are not always documenting the reasons students need to ride on specialized buses.
Additionally, the district does not see reimbursement for Medicaid transportation.
(Page 12-20) 6.
The district acts promptly and appropriately in response to any accidents that occur.
(Page 12-23) 7.
The district needs to strengthen its efforts to ensure that students behave appropriately on buses and take action to identify and seek reimbursement from students who vandalize buses.
(Page 12-23)
Vehicle Acquisition and Maintenance Functions 8.
The district has reduced its spare bus inventory, but needs a bus replacement policy.
(Page 12-25) 9.
The district provides timely routine servicing for buses and other vehicles and responds promptly to breakdowns and other unforeseen contingencies.
(Page 12-27) 10.
The district ensures that fuel purchases are cost-effective and efficiently supplies school buses and other vehicles with fuel.
(Page 12-29) 11.
The district maintains secure, conveniently located transportation facilities.
(Page 12-30) 12.
The district has a lower maintenance staff-to-vehicle ratio than state guidelines suggest, but provides them with professional development opportunities.
(Page 12-31) 13.
The district maintains a cost-effective inventory of parts, supplies, and equipment for its transportation department.
(Page 12-32)
Managerial Oversight 14.
The district provides appropriate technological and computer support for student transportation operations.
(Page 12-33) 15.
The district has a student transportation accountability system with goals, measurable objectives, and strategies but could make minor improvements to its system.
(Page 12-34) 16.
The district coordinates transportation planning with other departments and community entities but does not provide the board with sufficient options on how changes in policies would affect transportation expenditures.
(Page 12-35) 17.
The district monitors the fiscal condition of student transportation functions by regularly analyzing expenditures and reviewing them against the budget.
(Page 12-37) 18.
The district provides regular, accurate, and timely counts to the Florida Department of Education of the number of students transported.
(Page 12-37) 12-2 OPPAGA
Student Transportation 19.
While the district has outsourced some transportation functions, it has not developed cost information it needs to determine whether further outsourcing would reduce costs.
(Page 12-38) 20.
The district periodically reviews the organizational structure and staffing levels of the student transportation program to minimize administrative layers and processes.
(Page 12-39)
As seen in Exhibit 12-2, the district has two opportunities to save money on its transportation services.
Exhibit 12-2
Our Review Identified Two Ways the District Could Reduce Transportation Costs or Increase Revenues Ways to Save · Seek reimbursement for Medicaid transportation · it currently provides to some district students will reduce uncompensated transportation expenses.
(Page 12-22).
Reduce school bus-related vandalism and its unreimbursed costs.
(Page 12-24).
·
Potential Savings The district can receive an estimated $68,326 annually or $341,630 over five years from obtaining Medicaid reimbursement for transportation services to eligible students.
The district could save up to $69,000 per year or $345,000 over five years if it halved its costs by reducing or collecting reimbursement for school bus vandalism.
·
Source: OPPAGA and St. Lucie County School District.
Determining whether to take advantage of these opportunities is a district decision and should be based on many factors including district needs, public input, and school board priorities.
If it uses the opportunities to increase revenues or reduce costs, the district would be able to redirect the funds to other priorities, such as putting money into the classroom or addressing deficiencies identified in this report.
Background
____________________________________________________
Located on the Atlantic Ocean, St. Lucie County covers 581 square miles in the southeast Florida area.
The two main population centers in the county are Fort Pierce in the northern coastal portion of the county and Port St. Lucie in the southern coastal area.
The western part of the county largely contains citrus groves and cattle ranches, and the middle part has no major population centers.
The main growth areas are in the south and southwestern portions of the county.
The school district's transportation facilities consist of a main transportation facility in the west Port St. Lucie area and two secondary facilities in the Fort Pierce area.
These facilities provide for the storage of buses as well as office and meeting spaces for operations employees.
The geographic distance between the Fort Pierce and the St. Lucie areas presents significant challenges to the school district's transportation department.
To help meet these challenges, the St. Lucie County School District has organized student transportation by functions.
The operational function (managing and driving of bus routes) is split into four units, three of which are responsible for transporting students
OPPAGA
12-3
Student Transportation within specified geographic zones and the fourth is responsible for county transportation of students whose disabilities prevent them from riding regular buses.
Bus maintenance is generally centralized with the main transportation facility in west Port St. Lucie performing most maintenance functions and one of the Fort Pierce facilities performing some minor repairs.
The remaining functions such as the design of bus routes, dispatching, and overall transportation management are centralized in the main west Port St. Lucie facility (see Exhibit 12-3).
Exhibit 12-3
The Transportation Department Is Organized by Function School Board Members
Superintendent of Schools Executive Director of Food Services and Transportation Director of Transportation Secretary
Area Managers
Dispatchers
Fleet Manager
Safety /Training Coordinator
Routing
Payroll
Bus Drivers and Aides
Accounting
Parts Manager
Clerk
Technicians Source: St. Lucie County School District.
Parts Assistant
During the 2000-01 school year, the district provided transportation to 20,862 of its 29,538 students at 38 school centers throughout the county.
Among those being served were 1,008 students in exceptional education programs who needed special transportation.
During the 2001-02 year, the district had 377 school buses (including spares) in service on 306 school bus routes.
It also used these school buses for transporting students on approximately 2,774 extracurricular field trips and for transporting other community groups and organizations.
The district operated most buses on three routes each morning and afternoon (providing transportation to an elementary school, a middle school, and to a high school), which was made possible by the use of staggered school opening and closing times.
Such staggered times improve the efficiency of bus use.
Exhibit 12-4 presents selected student transportation data for the St. Lucie County School District and some of its peer districts in the state for the 2000-01 school year.
This data indicates that the district's 12-4 OPPAGA
Student Transportation performance fell within the middle of that of its peers on transportation operating cost per student and percent of expenditures paid from local funds.
The district performed better than all but two of its peers on operating expenditures per mile.
However, its bus occupancy rates were lower than all but one of its peers.
To improve occupancy rates, the district moved to the three-tiered routing system in 2001-02.
This increased its average occupancy rate from 66.76 to 70.27.
Exhibit 12-4
Comparative Student Transportation Data for St. Lucie County and Some of The Peer Districts Chosen by St. Lucie County School District Measure St. Lucie Alachua Escambia Marion 661 45,007 30,347 5.21% 382 6,341,215 $18,534,858 $2.57 79.55 74.73% 25.57% 1,610 38,555 22,849 3.48% 380 8,566,053
Polk 1,823 79,479 41,403 4.17% 469 6,394,199
Peer Sarasota Seminole Average 573 35,499 16,241 5.25% 221 5,281,000 298 60,729 24,771 12.18% 342 7,552,914 978 48,157 25,122 5.9% 329 6,508,098
Square Miles 581 902 Number of Students Enrolled 29,538 29,673 Number of Students Transported 20,862 15,120 Percentage of Ineligible Students Transported 1.87% 10.28% Number of Buses in Daily Service 313 180 Number of Miles Driven 6,626,589 4,913,208 Total Student Transportation Expenditures $12,840,508 $10,479,891 Operating Expenditures per Annual Mile 1 $1.80 $1.62 Average Bus Occupancy 66.76 84.00 Operating Percentage State Funding 1 64.67% 79.57% Operating Percentage Local 35.33% 20.43% Funding 1 Total Operating Transportation Expenditures per student 1 $570 $515 1
$16,669,308 $20,714,898 $12,564,399 $16,932,673 $15,982,671 $1.75 60.13 63.34% 36.66% $2.82 88.28 97.99% 2.01% $2.06 73.65 56.46% 43.54% $2.09 72.53 58.54% 41.46% $2.15 76.36 71.77% 28.23%
$529
$645
$432
$666
$628
$569
Does not include any funds spent for the acquisition of school buses.
Source: Q-Links: Florida District Transportation Profiles, July 2002 for School Year 2000-01, Florida Department of Education.
OPPAGA
12-5
Student Transportation
Student Transportation Services
1
The district improved the efficiency of its transportation function by discontinuing services to some students that are not eligible for state funding and by lengthening the distance between bus stops.
However, it needs to develop a policy defining unsafe walking conditions and continue to review ways to reduce transportation routing costs.
Routing specialists are responsible for the day-to-day routing functions of the school district The district creates and updates bus routes with the assistance of a computerized routing program.
The responsibility for creating and updating the bus routes falls on the four routing specialists, who are located in the main transportation facility in west Port St. Lucie.
The district uses a computerized routing program to assist the routing specialists in creating and updating the bus routes.
This program stores student addresses, displays these addresses on computerized maps of the county, and creates bus routes.
The routing specialists review the proposed bus routes and modify them based on their knowledge of the area, input from other district transportation employees, or the public.
Detailed directions, bus stop times, number of expected students at each bus stop, and maps are distributed to bus driver on the routes they are to drive.
This same information is made available to substitute bus drivers as needed.
Bus routes are frequently changed during the year.
In school year 2000-01, the district had 1,835 bus routes comprising 10,578 bus stops.
District routing specialists estimate that during that year 1,000 of the bus stops were changed.
Changes in the location of bus stops can be usually attributed to one of four reasons: · · · · growth in student population, changes in home addresses, request of parents, or changes in assigned schools (allowed at the end of each nine-week school period).
Other modifications include having to move a bus stop to correct a problem, such as those related to youth gangs or changing a bus route to eliminate overcrowding.
In general, more changes occur in exceptional student education (ESE) routes than in regular student routes.
When they receive complaints, transportation employees fill out a standard complaint form.
The routing department handles complaints dealing with bus routing and stops.
If changes are made in a bus route or stop, a memo is issued to the parents and the school for the route.
Other complaints such as those dealing with driver performance are turned over to the area managers or the transportation director for action.
The transportation department logs complaints and responds to the individuals making the complaints.
However, it does not systematically evaluate complaint logs to identify trends that indicate systematic problems.
12-6
OPPAGA
Student Transportation The district modified school bell times to better ensure timely service In 2001-02, the St. Lucie County School District changed its staggered school start times to help improve its use of buses.
As a result, it was able to eliminate nine bus routes and the need for 18 buses.
In the first year of implementing the new schedule; however, the district had problems with the timely pickup and discharge of students, especially those in middle school.
Our May 2002 survey of 868 teachers in the district showed that 31% did not believe that school bus pickup and delivery was timely.
Because middle schools had the last opening and closing times, they were most affected.
Middle school principals estimated that buses were usually 15 to 20 minutes late each day in picking up middle school students in the afternoon with some buses having been over an hour late.
To address the timeliness issue, the district further modified its bell schedules for the 2002-03 school year.
These schedules increased the time between elementary and middle tiers by 15 minutes.
In addition, the district trained all school administrators assigned to ramp management duties in bus loading and unloading procedures.
This training emphasized the importance of timeliness and maintaining schedules.
According to transportation employees and middle school principals, the timeliness of bus arrival and departure times improved significantly in school year 2002-03.
Then district increased the number of on-site safety reviews it conducts for proposed changes to bus routes and stops prior to approving the changes According to district employees, the routing employees or district safety/security officers are to physically inspect proposed bus routes or bus stop locations to ensure their safety.
However, district employees reported that only an estimated one-third of all new stops used in school year 2001-02 had been reviewed for safety by December 2001.
For school year 2002-03, the district resolved this issue though the use of "dry runs" and area managers riding routes.
Before schools opened in the fall, bus drivers completed "dry runs" (without students onboard) of their assigned routes and reported any problems to the routing department for modification.
After schools opened, route managers and the safety/training conduct route verifications and assessments by riding a minimum of 10 complete routes per week.
By November 2003, all bus routes and stops were checked for safety and practicality.
In 2001-02, the district reduced the number of students it transports who are ineligible for state transportation funding The state provides transportation funding for all students who live more than two miles from their assigned schools, elementary students living closer to their schools if they would walk under hazardous conditions as defined by state guidelines, and those students who require specialized transportation to attend school.
All other students are not eligible for state transportation funding.
In 2000-01, the St. Lucie County School District transported 398 students who were not eligible for state transportation funding.
This amounted to 1.9% of the students the district transports, which was lower than the percentage of ineligible riders in peer districts and the seventh lowest percentage of ineligible riders in the state.
In response to questions we posed during our fieldwork, the district reduced the number of ineligible riders it transports to 273 students, with an estimated annual savings of $47,975 ($242,125 over five years).
The district could save an additional $49,025 if it discontinued transporting the remaining students who do not meet state guidelines for transportation funding.
However, district safety employees examined the routes and determined that the remaining 273 students that do not meet state guidelines would be subject to unsafe walking conditions if they were not riding a bus.
OPPAGA
12-7
Student Transportation It can be an appropriate local decision for districts to provide transportation to some students who face unsafe walking conditions that do not meet the hazard threshold established in state law.
However, districts need to have formal policies that establish under what circumstances they will do so and what actions they will subsequently take to resolve the unsafe walking conditions and districts should identify the cost of providing this supplemental transportation.
The St. Lucie County School Board has established guidelines transporting students, but these policies need to be enhanced.
The board's transportation policy provides that Any student who resides more than a reasonable walking distance from the nearest appropriate school is eligible to ride a district school bus to and from school....
· Students with special transportation needs as defined by s. 236.083(1) (b), (c), and (f), Florida Statutes, may ride a school bus regardless of distance.
The Board will transport children attending the public schools of the district within the limits of the law.
A student who is subject to hazardous walking conditions, as determined by the Board, whose grade level does not exceed grade 5 may be transported to school by bus.
·
This policy does not provide guidelines for what constitutes "reasonable walking distances" or "hazardous walking conditions."
This creates the potential that parents seeking to have their children transported will not be subject to the same standards.
The policy also does not identify what the district will do (such as working with local law enforcement and transportation officials) to address the hazardous walking conditions, such as requesting that sidewalks be added along roads that students must walk along.
The district also has not regularly identified the cost of providing the supplemental transportation; this information should annually be reported to the superintendent and the board to allow the district's elected representatives to monitor the cost of this activity.
(See Transportation Best Practice 16, below.)
In 2001-02, the district took steps to increase average bus occupancy, but should continue to look for opportunities to increase routing efficiencies An important measure of transportation efficiency is average bus occupancy.
Average bus occupancy is determined by dividing the number of students transported by the number of buses on scheduled bus routes.
St. Lucie County School District's average bus occupancy rate in school year 2000-01 was 66.76 students per bus and in school year 2001-02 it was 70.27.
If a known number of students can be appropriately served using fewer buses, the average bus occupancy rate and the overall efficiency of the student transportation system will be improved.
Given that not all buses in the district are operated at capacity, the key item that limits bus occupancy is time.
The state has a policy recommending that elementary student bus routes times are limited to no more than 50 minutes with secondary student bus routes to no more than 60 minutes.
Working within this policy, the district can improve its average bus occupancy rate by · increasing the distance between bus stops to a minimum of one-half (1/2) mile which reduces the time necessary to pick up a given number of students and enables the district to increase the area served and pick up more students and studying potential revisions to how students are transported for the controlled choice student OPPAGA
·
12-8
Student Transportation assignment plan.
The district increased the distance between bus stops Bus drivers have to perform a number of functions from the time they leave one bus stop to the time they are ready to leave the next bus stop.
These functions include · · · · · · · · checking to see if all students are properly seated in the bus; retracting electrically operated bus stop signs mounted on arms on the side of the bus and front bumper safety arm; accelerating the bus to the posted speed limit; starting to decelerate the bus; deploying the warning lights indicating that the bus is preparing to stop; stopping the bus and deploying the electrically operated bus stop signs and front bumper safety arm; opening the front bus door; and waiting for students to get on the bus and seat themselves.
Because all of these functions take time to perform, reducing the number of bus stops can either reduce the time it takes a bus to get to its final destination or increase the distance it travels and thereby increase the number of children it can pick up within established time limits.
Currently, the St. Lucie School District's policy is that bus stops will be placed so that high school students walk approximately one half mile or less from their homes to a bus stops and elementary students walk approximately one quarter mile or less.
This is less than the state guideline of 1.5 miles.
As a result of this policy, bus stops for elementary students are frequently placed less than one half mile apart.
For example, in 2001-02, district employees analyzed a random sample of 30 bus routes (10% of the total routes) and found that of the 684 stops made during these routes, 276 stops (40%) occurred within one half mile of the previous stop.
Most of stops less than one-half mile apart were located on elementary school routes.
In preparation of the 2002-03 school year and in response to questions we asked during this review, the district reviewed the placement of all bus stops to reduce the number of times each bus stops and increase average occupancy rates.
As a result, the district decreased the number of stops by 33%, from 10,587 in school year 2001-02 to 7,112 in school year 2002-03.
However, the district may be able to further increase reduce bus stops and increase occupancy rates if it changed its policy regarding the distances students walk from their homes to their bus stops.
The district has taken steps to reduce to costs of transporting students to magnet schools, but should consider other ways of reducing costs within the context of its controlled choice program Another area for potential improvements in transportation efficiency is to consider changing how students are transported within the district's controlled choice student assignment plan.
In 1970, a U.S. District Court found that the St. Lucie County School Board was operating a dual, segregated school system.
To remedy this situation, school board adopted a controlled student assignment plan in 1991.
School board policy 5.80 (2) (a) defines controlled choice as ...a student assignment methodology that permits parents to select the school their child will attend within the limits set by physical space and diversity goals.
There is no individual residential attendance zoned for OPPAGA 12-9
Student Transportation each school.
Instead, the St. Lucie County controlled choice model divides the District into three geographically described choice zones, each containing several elementary schools, one or more middle schools and one or more high schools.
Parents and students list their preferences from among the schools located in their choice zone, in rank order, with no guarantee of assignment to any particular school.
Students are then assigned to a school based on physical space, diversity guidelines, transportation availability, parental choice, sibling priority, school-in-the-workplace priority, proximity priority, and lotteries.
If the student is not assigned to his or her first or second choice school, the student will be placed on the waiting list for his or her first choice school according to the policies of this Plan.
To achieve its diversity goals, the district created 3 zones that are primarily oriented in a north-south alignment and run most of the length of the county.
Children receive bus transportation to any school within their zone.
The controlled choice student assignment plan also includes five district magnet schools.
Attendance to these schools is limited using the criteria such as diversity guidelines, date of application, and geographic restrictions as seen below.
· · · · · Village Green Elementary Extended Day Magnet School--Districtwide Fort Pierce Magnet School of the Arts--Districtwide grades 3-8 Fairlawn Elementary Academic Magnet School--Zones 1 and 3 Frances K. Sweet Elementary Academic Magnet School--Zone 2 Lincoln Park Academy--Districtwide grades 6-12 1
The U.S. District Court reviewed the existing situation in St. Lucie County and ruled in September 1997 that the school district had eliminated vestiges of the past dual and segregated school system.
As a result, the court withdrew its jurisdiction over the matter and returned authority over all school district decisionmaking to the appropriate local and state authorities.
The controlled student choice assignment plan has addressed the district's historical segregation problem, but raises the district's transportation costs.
2 With the controlled choice plan, students in the same neighborhood can be bused to many different schools; and, as court records show, "the district is finding that more and more parents and students are choosing schools farther from their residence in order to obtain an educational program they want or in order to attend a school they perceive as first rate."
These choices come with increased transportation costs and student time spent on buses as the travel distances between homes and schools increase.
The district is attempting to reduce the cost of transporting magnet school students by establishing three transfer centers (located at C.A. Moore, Dan McCarty and Forest Grove) for the students attending the two secondary age group district wide magnet schools beginning in school year 2002-03.
Students attending a magnet school at the other end of the county from where they live will be taken from their local bus stop to the transfer center located in their zone, and then ride a different bus to their magnet school.
During the first four weeks of school, district employees report using the transfer centers has Although the district considers this a magnet school, it only serves students in one zone.
Therefore, it poses no more transportation issues than regular schools.
2 Controlled choice also allows the district to maximize its use of classroom space, thereby reducing its construction and instructional costs.
See Chapter 10, Facilities Construction.
The district has not analyzed the effects of the controlled choice program to determine how its overall expenditures have been affected by controlled choice.
1
12-10
OPPAGA
Student Transportation been successful in reducing the number of buses going to magnet schools by 25 buses.
The district estimates that this will save $133,556 annually.
The district should continue to monitor the impact of the transfer centers and expand this practice to the other schools if it is successful.
It also should consider alternative busing strategies such as · · · · monitoring county demographics and, if possible, creating more compact zones; using "corridor" or "arterial" busing, by which parents transport their children to central pick-up points; limiting the number of times students may change schools during the school year; and requiring magnet school students living outside the normal attendance areas for their schools to obtain their own transportation.
These options could reduce district transportation costs and increase the level of district resources that could be devoted to instruction, but would require careful study and community input.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
We recommend that the district adopt a policy defining what it considers to be "reasonable walking distances" and "hazardous (unsafe) walking condition," what actions it will take to work with local law enforcement and transportation officials to address these conditions, and annually report the board and superintendent its costs of providing transportation to students who do not meet the state transportation criteria.
We recommend that the district examine its policy regarding the distances students walk from their homes to bus stops to determine if longer walking distances would allow it to spread bus stops further apart thereby increasing occupancy rates or reducing bus travel times.
The district should continue to strive to place bus stops at least one-half mile apart.
We recommend that the district consider alternative busing strategies such as use of corridor busing, creating more compact zones, and limiting or eliminating magnet school transportation.
Action Plans 12-1, 12-2, and 12-3 provide the steps needed to implement these recommendations.
·
·
Action Plan 12-1 Developing Criteria for "Reasonable Walking Distance" and "Hazardous (Unsafe) Walking Conditions" and Encouraging the Creation of Safe Walking Environments Strategy Action Needed Develop criteria for "reasonable walking distances" and "hazardous (unsafe) walking conditions" and encourage the creation of safe walking environments.
Step 1: The transportation department and safety team should develop draft criteria for what the district will consider "reasonable walking distances" and "hazardous (unsafe) walking conditions" and present the draft criteria to the superintendent.
Step 2: The superintendent should present draft criteria to the school board for approval.
Step 3: The school board should adopt the criteria.
Step 4: The transportation department should make any necessary changes to routes in compliance with changed criteria.
OPPAGA
12-11
Student Transportation The transportation department should continue to actively coordinate with local governments, law enforcement agencies, and community coalitions on ways to improve student walking conditions such as crosswalks and crossing guards.
Transportation managers, superintendent, school board, routing employees.
June 2003 and ongoing.
Step 5:
Who Is Responsible Time Frame
Action Plan 12-2 Increase Distance Between Bus Stops Strategy Action Needed Examine the policy on walking distance between homes and bus stops to determine whether increasing those distances would enable the district to increase average occupancy rates.
Step 1: The transportation department should comprehensively review the impact of lengthening the distance students walk between their homes to increase bus occupancy rates and present the results to the superintendent.
Step 2: The superintendent should present the report and any recommendation to change the policy on the distance students walk between their homes and bus stops to the school board.
Step 3: The school board should vote for any proposed change in its policy on the distance students walk between their homes and bus stops.
Step 4: Transportation department should make necessary changes to routes in compliance with changed board.
Transportation managers and route coordinators, superintendent, and school board.
June 2003
Who Is Responsible Time Frame
Action Plan 12-3 Conduct Study to Reduce Transportation Costs within Controlled Choice Student Assignment Plan Strategy Action Needed Study ways to reduce transportation costs by modifying the controlled choice program.
Step 1: The district should examine the transportation and other costs associated with the controlled choice program as well as the potential costs associated with modifying the program.
Changes to be considered include the current pilot magnet school transportation system, choice zones and their boundaries and the use of corridor busing.
This review would present the impact of changes on the student transportation system including number of buses needed, drivers needed, and savings to the district.
It would also present the potential effect of these changes on the district's ability to achieve diversity in its school populations and on the costs of constructing and operating schools.
The results of the review should be given to the superintendent.
Step 2: The superintendent should present the report to the school board and recommend any changes that could reduce transportation costs without having an unreasonable effect on the district's achievement of its diversity goals.
Step 3: School board should vote upon the proposed changes in board policies regarding the controlled choice program.
Step 4: The transportation department should make necessary changes to routes in compliance with changed board policy.
Transportation managers and route coordinators, finance personnel, facilities personnel, superintendent, and school board.
July 2003
Who Is Responsible Time Frame
12-12
OPPAGA
Student Transportation
2
The district ensures that all regular school bus routes and activity trips operate in accord with established routines and safely and promptly handles most unexpected contingencies affecting those operations.
However, schools do not pay the full costs of transportation services for field trips.
The district has established policies and procedures to deal with overcrowding, students leaving the bus at other than their normal bus stop, and bus breakdowns Bus overcrowding is an infrequent problem in the school district.
According to route coordinators, the beginning of the school year is the most frequent time when overcrowding occurs.
The drivers who find that their buses are over capacity at afternoon dismissal will notify the dispatcher of the situation and either get permission to proceed or have students transferred to another bus.
In morning pickup overflows, the driver will take a head count with names to determine if students belong on another bus or are unauthorized riders.
If the new riders are legitimate, bus stops will be adjusted or a larger bus assigned within 24 hours.
The district has a policy that states that students cannot get off the school bus at stops other their assigned home stops without the written permission of their parents or guardians and principals.
The district has established procedures to use in case of bus breakdowns.
These procedures have been distributed to shop foremen, area managers, dispatchers, security officers, and bus drivers.
Some students have longer bus rides than provided by board guidelines State policy limits the time students ride buses to 50 minutes for elementary students and 60 minutes for secondary school students.
However, some students have bus rides that exceed these limits.
In the fall of 2002, 464 elementary school students rode buses in excess of 50 minutes and 509 middle and high school students rode buses in excess of 60 minutes.
The primary reason for these excessive ride times is the long distances between the students' homes and their assigned schools.
The district did not have an effective process to deal with the impact of driver absences on bus schedules, but now has more substitute drivers The district has procedures to limit driver absenteeism.
It gives bus drivers four days of sick leave on the first pay period of each year.
Drivers then earn one additional day in September, October, November, December, January, and February for a total of nine sick days per year.
Drivers may use up to five (5) days of their sick leave as personal leave with pay.
They must request permission to use leave other than sick or emergency leave from their immediate supervisor at least 48 hours in advance of taking the leave.
This allows the supervisor to arrange for a substitute driver.
However, these procedures are ineffective in ensuring that the district has sufficient drivers to operate all bus routes in a timely manner.
A primary problem is that the district lacks enough substitute bus drivers.
The district had 28 substitute drivers as of May 2002.
However, district employees indicated that two of these substitute bus drivers were driving regular bus routes for months and were thus not available to substitute on other routes.
Other substitute bus drivers are not available due to their wish to drive only field trips.
As a result, the district had few available substitute drivers available to substitute for regular bus drivers.
For example, during our initial field visit in May 2002, only 9 drivers were available for
OPPAGA
12-13
Student Transportation substitute work.
In contrast, the district had an average of 21 drivers absent per day during school year 2001-02.
The district has made efforts to recruit additional substitute drivers and reports that as of September 2002, it employed 47 substitute bus drivers.
However, some of these drivers were classified as "waiting to be permanent", which indicates that they have been assigned regular routes.
This left 24 drivers available for substitute work.
When there are insufficient substitute drivers, area transportation managers resort to "patching" routes.
"Patching" routes involves broadcasting a call to all bus drivers to identify those who believe that they have sufficient time and bus capacity to pick up students at bus stops that will not have regular bus service due to lack of bus drivers.
While this method allows students to be picked up from bus stops who would otherwise not have service, it contributes to the problem of buses arriving late to school due to driver inexperience with the service area and lack of time between bus routes on the current three-tier bus schedule.
In addition to employing more substitutes, the district can take other actions to reduce problems associated with regular driver absenteeism.
For example, the district could develop a driver attendance incentive program to offer drivers incentives for not being absent from work.
The district should determine whether employing more substitutes or providing driver attendance incentives is more cost effective in reducing problems caused by driver absenteeism.
The district's field trip manual contains rules and procedures regarding field trips The district schedules buses and drivers for the many miles of trips taken by students for educational, extracurricular, and athletic purposes.
Students in the district traveled 262,689 miles on field trips using district-provided transportation in school year 2000-01.
Field trip miles accounted for 4% of all school bus miles during the year (6,626,589 miles).
The current field trip manual requires that the transportation department receive bus trip requests at least 14 days (10 working days) in advance of the trip.
While only authorized exception to this time-line is for athletic competitions in which trips are contingent upon game results, transportation employees have said schools schedule field trips only 48 hours in advance.
Schools canceling trips less than 24 hours in advance are charged a fee based on the estimated time and mileage requested on the trip form.
The bus drivers for field trips are selected based on a seniority system in accordance with the negotiated union contract.
At the beginning of the school year, the most senior driver is offered the opportunity to drive the first field trip.
If the driver declines the field trip, the driver is put on the bottom of the seniority list and the next senior driver is offered the field trip.
This continues until a driver is found for the trip.
After completing the field trip, the bus driver is put on the bottom of the seniority list.
The one exception to this procedure occurs for field trips taken during the morning and afternoon bus routes.
Substitute bus drivers who wish to drive only field trips are used for these field trips.
Schools are not fully compensating the transportation budget for school-controlled trips using district buses The St. Lucie County School District provides four types of transportation for its students.
· Core bus routes.
These trips take students from their bus stops to schools in the morning and return them in the afternoon.
They account for the majority of miles driven by school buses.
These trips are controlled by the district and paid for by districtwide allocations.
After-school activity trips.
These trips involve transporting students to or from district-wide extracurricular activities and thereby facilitate student participation in these programs as part of the OPPAGA
·
12-14
Student Transportation district's school choice program.
Generally, these trips take students from their schools to centralized neighborhood drop-off points (not regular bus stops).
The trips are controlled by the district and paid from district-wide funds.
Field and athletic trips.
These trips take students from their schools to places where they can observe real-life educational or instructional situations or participate in athletic events.
They are generally requested by schools and paid for from school budgets.
After school tutorials.
These trips take students participating in after-school tutorial programs from their schools to neighborhood drop off points.
These trips are also scheduled and paid for by individual schools.
·
·
Schools may not be fully reimbursing the transportation department for the transportation costs schoolcontrolled trips.
The district charges schools $.50 per mile and $20 per hour for driver time for their school-controlled trips.
These reimbursement rates were set in the 1998-99 school year and have not been adjusted since that time.
District transportation believes that these rates do not fully cover the cost of school-controlled trips.
The district charges other organizations such as the YMCA and local city parks and recreation programs $1 per mile per bus for use of district buses, with those organizations directly paying for driver time.
Based on a district analysis of school-controlled trips taken in the 2001-02 school year, the district estimates the unreimbursed cost of providing the trips was $176,000.
According to district employees, the district has modified the procedures used to account for the cost of transportation services in order to isolate the costs of each type of transportation service.
In school year 2002-03, schools will be responsible for managing the budgets for school-controlled trips.
This will benefit the district in two ways.
First, it will give the district a more accurate picture of the cost associated with each service the transportation department provides.
Second, it will allow schools to more effectively manage their resources according to their individuals needs.
Recommendations · ·
____________________________________________
We recommend that the district evaluate its options to reduce the impact of current levels of bus driver absenteeism to improve the timeliness of bus service.
We recommend that the chief financial officer, with the assistance of the transportation department, set field trip transportation fees that will fully compensate the transportation department for all school-controlled trips.
We further recommend that the revised fees be implemented immediately.
Action Plans 12-4 and 12-5 provide the steps needed to implement this recommendation.
Action Plan 12-4 Evaluate options to reduce impact of bus driver absenteeism on operations Strategy Action Needed Evaluate options available to reduce the impact of current levels of bus driver absenteeism to improve the timeliness of service.
Step 1: The transportation department should examine the impact of absent drivers on district transportation operations including the timeliness of bus routes and the need for substitute bus drivers and consider options such as hiring additional substitute bus drivers and establishing a bus driver attendance incentive to reduce the impact of absent drivers on operations.
OPPAGA
12-15
Student Transportation Step 2: The transportation department should present the study to the superintendent.
In turn, the superintendent will present the study to the school board with a recommendation that the board adopt the study and its recommendations.
Step 3: The school board should adopt the study and recommendations.
Step 4: The district personnel and transportation departments should implement the approved recommendations.
Transportation managers, district superintendent, school board, district personnel office The beginning of school year 2003-04
Who is Responsible Time Frame
Action Plan 12-5 Schools Fully Reimburse the Transportation Department for School-Controlled Trip Costs Using District Buses Strategy Action Needed Establish school-controlled trip transportation fees that fully reimburse the transportation department for trips using school buses.
Step 1: The chief financial officer, with the assistance of the transportation department, should calculate the transportation department's current cost associated with school-controlled trips (e.g., cost of drivers, equipment, and administration) and devise a school-controlled trip rate structure that allows all of these costs to be reimbursed to the transportation department.
Step 2: The chief financial officer should request that the school board, through the district superintendent, make the new school-controlled trip rate structure effective immediately.
Step 3: The school board should approve the new school-controlled trip rate structure and makes the new rate structure effective immediately.
Step 4: The chief financial officer, with the assistance of the transportation department, should disseminate this information to the district schools.
Step 5: The chief financial officer, with the assistance of the transportation department, should calculate the cost of school-controlled trip transportation prior to the beginning of each school year and disseminate this information to the district schools.
Chief financial officer, transportation department managers, district superintendent, school board Completion of the above steps by the beginning of school year 2003-04 and each subsequent school year.
Who is Responsible Time Frame
3
The district effectively and efficiently recruits and retains the bus drivers and attendants it needs.
The St. Lucie County School District has some turnover in its bus drivers and assistants.
For the school year beginning in August 2001, the district started out with 307 drivers and 42 attendants.
As of April 2002, 40 drivers (13%) and seven attendants (16.67%) had left their positions.
The district estimates that ten percent to 15% of drivers terminate employment with the district annually.
According to district employees, this type of turnover is expected; they would be concerned if turnover rates were 25% or more.
The school district does not systematically collect information on why bus drivers and assistants leave their positions by holding formal exit interviews with personnel who are leaving their positions.
However, from informal interviews, transportation department managers believe that half of the drivers
12-16
OPPAGA
Student Transportation terminated their bus driving jobs to work for different employers and the remaining drivers retire, resign for poor health, or were terminated for poor performance.
Further, it is believed that drivers continue on the job because they want the district's benefit package, want the independence of being a bus driver, and enjoy serving their students.
However, by developing a more formal system of conducting exit interviews with transportation personnel, the district may be able to obtain more accurate information on the district's relative competitiveness for bus drivers and the changes it may need to make to more effectively recruit and retain bus drivers and assistants.
The district has several means of advertising bus driver positions The district uses several methods to notify the public of job opportunities for bus drivers.
It places ads for drivers on local cable TV channels and in local newspaper classified advertising sections.
For example, the district has placed newspaper ads that solicit substitute bus drivers and informs applicants that no high school diploma or GED is required, training is provided at no cost, the applicants need a good driving record and the ability to work with small children, and starting pay is $8.50 an hour.
3 The district also posts position vacancies at school locations, on the district web page and recruits at job fairs.
The transportation department gives individuals inquiring about bus driver or attendant jobs employment applications and refers them to the personnel office.
The personnel office takes the completed application and conducts background checks while the transportation department checks driving records from the Florida Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles.
The district provides commercial driver license training through a contract with Indian River Community College at no cost to the driver.
After drivers complete the training and are hired, they are given drug-screening tests.
The district offers higher starting salaries for bus drivers than neighboring districts The starting salary for regular bus drivers is higher in St. Lucie County School District than starting salaries in nearby counties.
The district's starting salary for regular bus drivers is $12.19 per hour (2001-02 salary schedule).
In August 2002, school districts in neighboring counties (Indian River, Martin, Okeechobee, and Palm Beach) had starting salaries for bus drivers that ranged from $8.00 to $9.98 per hour with an average salary of $9.08.
Although relatively high starting salaries can help it attract bus drivers, the district should periodically study local labor markets to ensure that it is not offering bus drivers higher starting salaries than necessary and use the results of the study in labor negotiations.
Recommendations · ·
_____________________________________________
We recommend that the district improve the data it collects to assist it in meeting the challenge of recruiting and retaining the bus drivers and attendants it needs.
We recommend that the district examine the local labor market to determine whether it should negotiate changes in starting bus salaries Action Plans 12-6 and 12-7 provide the steps needed to implement this recommendation.
3
The $8.50 per hour starting pay is for substitute bus drivers.
Starting salary for regular bus drivers is $12.19 per hour (2001-02 salary schedule)
OPPAGA
12-17
Student Transportation Action Plan 12-6 Employment-Related Data Collection and Analysis Strategy Action Needed Collect and analyze bus driver and attendant exit interviews to help formulate and implement plans to improve the district's efforts to recruit and retain bus drivers and attendants.
Step 1: Transportation managers, with the assistance of the district's Personnel Department, should take the necessary steps determine what information should be collected from employees resigning their bus driver and attendant positions.
Step 2: The personnel department, with the assistance of transportation managers, should create a bus driver and attendant exit interview guide to assist interviewers in conducting exit interviews.
Step 3: The personnel department should conduct exit interviews with resigning bus drivers and attendants and share the results with the transportation department.
Step 4: Transportation managers, with the assistance of the district's personnel department, should determine what information on wages and benefits need to be collected from adjacent school districts and local employers that are likely to be competing for the pool of applicants for positions as bus drivers and attendants.
They should also determine what school districts and local employers this information should be collected from.
Step 5: The personnel department, with the assistance of transportation managers, should survey the adjacent school districts and local employers for wage and benefit information as determined above on an annual basis and share the results with the transportation department.
Step 6: Transportation managers, with the assistance of the personnel department, should periodically analyze exit interview and wages and salary information to formulate and implement plans for the recruitment and retention of bus drivers and attendants.
Transportation managers, personnel officer June 2003 annually thereafter
Who is Responsible Time Frame
Action Plan 12-7 Determine the Need to Negotiate For Changes in Starting Bus Driver Salaries Strategy Action Needed Determine whether to negotiate with the union for changes in starting bus salaries.
Step 1: Using wage and benefit information obtained above, transportation managers (with the assistance of the district's personnel department) should determine salaries and benefits the district needs to offer in order to effectively compete with neighboring districts and the local labor market for bus drivers .
Step 2: If necessary, district negotiators should use the collective bargaining process to bring bus driver starting salaries in line with the local market.
Transportation managers, personnel officer May 2004 and periodically thereafter
Who is Responsible Time Frame Source: OPPAGA.
12-18
OPPAGA
Student Transportation
4
The district trains, supervises, and assists bus drivers to enable them to meet bus driving standards and maintain acceptable student discipline on the bus.
The district provides bus drivers sufficient training, supervision, and support The district offers initial training classes for prospective bus drivers through a contract with Indian River Community College.
Training classes allows prospective bus drivers to receive a class B (school bus) commercial driver's license.
Training consists of 25 hours of classroom training covering topics such as student discipline, safe driving skills, and district policies and procedures.
The trainees also receive 30 hours of behind the wheel training.
The district also provides drivers with a physical examination to ensure that they are physically capable of safely operating buses.
The district also provides in-service training and testing for current bus drivers and monitors.
Each driver receives three training days each year.
In addition to "dry" (no students onboard) bus runs conducted just prior to the beginning of the school year, this training includes topics such as defensive driving, behavior management, emergency procedures, first aid, fire safety, and standard operating procedures.
The drivers also receive yearly dexterity testing at the same time that they receive their annual driving physicals.
Transportation managers have regular interactions with and oversight of bus drivers.
All area managers and training employees have district-assigned automobiles to enable them to observe drivers performing their duties; however, the area managers are frequently "tied down" to the bus compound taking care of immediate problems such as absentee drivers and complaints.
According to transportation managers, district employees ride with bus drivers on an as-needed basis.
Driver performance is evaluated in writing annually through the personnel evaluation process but this process should be strengthened.
A sample of evaluations reviewed showed deficiencies such as the driver lacking bus seating charts (a violation of both Florida Law and School Board Operating Policy) or excessive use of the radio.
While the evaluation form requires that suggestions to correct deficiencies be written in the comment section of the form, the sampling of forms did not include comments for improvement in areas found deficient.
The district has a safe driver policy.
This policy assigns points to various violations and outlines the actions the district will take as points accumulate.
For example, a bus driver who was at fault but not cited in an accident involving property damage of less than $100 would be assessed one point.
A driver accumulating one point within a year would receive a written reprimand.
A driver who failed to stop at a railroad crossing in a bus loaded with children would be assessed 10 points.
A driver accumulating 10 points in one year would have his or her employment terminated.
An employee who commits a violation of the safe driver policy while in their own personal vehicle and elects to attend a defensive driving school to settle the citation will not be assessed points.
The transportation department has taken steps to ensure that all employees who are authorized to drive school buses either remain qualified or else receive appropriate suspension or retraining.
The safety specialist reviews the DHSMV reports on all district drivers weekly.
If a problem is found, the driver is contacted and informed that he or she must clear up the deficiency before driving again.
The transportation department also places printouts from the state's traffic violation database in personnel files three times a year.
OPPAGA
12-19
Student Transportation The St. Lucie County School District uses a drug and alcohol testing program to deter bus drivers and other employees holding commercial drivers licenses from using drugs and alcohol in the workplace.
The personnel office uses private contractors to provide pre-employment drug screening for all new driver trainees.
Using a random process, the personnel office selects regular drivers for testing each quarter.
During the course of a school year, 50% of the drivers are tested drugs and 10% are tested for alcohol.
Other drug and alcohol tests administered include those for drivers who have been involved in accidents in which the employee receives a citation and a vehicle was towed, who show symptoms of drug or alcohol abuse, and when need follow-up testing.
District employees who test positive for alcohol or drugs are subject to disciplinary action up to and including dismissal.
According to district administrators, few tests have yielded positive results in the past seven years.
The district has an employee assistance program to assist employees who admit to substance abuse problems prior to test results being received.
While in the employment assistance program, employees are not allowed to drive or repair buses.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
None, as the district meets this best practice.
5
The district provides student transportation services for exceptional students in a coordinated fashion that minimizes hardships.
However, exceptional education employees are not always documenting the reasons students need to ride on specialized buses.
Additionally, the district does not seek reimbursement for Medicaid transportation.
ESE employees do not always document reasons for placing students on specialized buses Exceptional education (ESE) students need special services to meet their educational goals.
These include students who are gifted or have learning disabilities, physical disabilities, or emotional handicaps.
Some ESE students ride regular buses to their assigned schools.
However, others need specialized transportation services such as wheelchairs lifts, supplemental medical oxygen, special transportation restraints, or controlled temperature environments.
The district transportation program handles such needs by transporting these students using a number of specially equipped buses and their drivers and aides.
Special transportation services cost more to provide than regular transportation services.
Currently the district operates 53 of the specially equipped buses on daily runs and has six of these buses for use as spares.
Specialized student transportation needs are determined in meetings where teachers, psychologists, and parents develop individual education plans (IEPs) that specify the services the students need to receive.
After the IEP is developed, transportation employees are informed about any needed specialized transportation services.
Transportation routing employees take this information and subsequently adjust bus routes to provide the specialized services.
District employee interviews indicate that ESE personnel and the transportation department personnel frequently communicate about the transportation of ESE students and on counting numbers of ESE students for funding purposes.
12-20
OPPAGA
Student Transportation As outlined in Chapter 5 of this report, district policy regarding ESE Students in general requires that students be placed in the least restrictive learning environment available to them.
However, current school board policy is silent regarding specific guidelines for the provision of transportation services for ESE students, only saying that students with special transportation needs as defined in statutes (e.g., dual enrolled students and pregnant students) may ride a school bus regardless of distance.
IEPs should contain sufficient information adequately documenting the need for specialized transportation.
However, our review of 25 IEPs of students receiving specialized transportation in school year 2001-02 found that only 14 of these IEPs contained sufficient information adequately documenting the need for specialized transportation.
Unnecessary specialized transportation of ESE students can increase transportation costs and reduce state funding.
Lack of clarity regarding the district's policy on transporting ESE students can result in the district using more expensive specialized transportation services for students who can ride regular buses.
The buses used by the school district for specialized transportation hold fewer students, frequently have longer bus runs, and cost up to three times more to per student operate than regular buses.
District policy should ensure that ESE students ride a regular school bus whenever possible and appropriate.
In addition, the district could lose state funding for transporting ESE students on specialized buses if their need for the specialized transportation is not documented.
The district does not seek Medicaid transportation reimbursements Medicaid will reimburse the school district for transporting eligible exceptional education students to places where they receive medical treatments or services.
For example, the district could receive a Medicaid reimbursement for transporting an eligible exceptional education student to and from school if the student receives physical therapy at the school site as part of his or her individual educational plan.
The district has not applied for Medicaid transportation reimbursements.
District employees report that the ESE and transportation offices are working together to identify cost effective means to collect and verify the data the district needs to receive Medicaid reimbursement.
However, these employees believe that the cost of submitting the claims would probably exceed the potential reimbursement.
The Department of Education has recently issued information on the Medicaid Certified Match Program for school districts.
This information includes a spreadsheet districts can use to estimate the revenue they could receive if they billed Medicaid for transportation services.
Using this spreadsheet and updated figures provided by the district, we estimated that the district would generate $146,626 a year in Medicaid reimbursements.
If, as district employees believe, the district would have to hire two employees at an annual cost of $78,300 to provide the documentation needed to bill Medicaid, the district should be able to net $68,326 by billing Medicaid for transportation services.
Currently 10 school districts in the state are either filing for Medicaid reimbursement for transportation services or are in the process of doing so.
The Agency for Health Care Administration (AHCA) is funding a pilot project in Orange County to enable the district to process its own Medicaid forms instead of using a third party billing agent.
If the project is successful and moves to other districts, the St. Lucie County School District will be able to reduce its costs of processing Medicaid reimbursement claims.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
We recommend that the district review and modify its exceptional student education (ESE) procedures to ensure that students ride regular buses whenever possible and appropriate.
OPPAGA
12-21
Student Transportation · We recommend that the district apply for Medicaid reimbursement for all qualified exceptional education trips.
Action Plans 12-8 and 12-9 provide the steps needed to implement these recommendations.
Action Plan 12-8 Improve Exceptional Student Transportation Procedures Strategy Action Needed District to review and modify its exceptional student education procedures to ensure that students ride regular buses whenever possible and appropriate.
Step 1: The district exceptional student education (ESE) office, with the assistance of the transportation department, should recommend to the superintendent that the school district adopt a policy requiring that students ride regular buses whenever possible and appropriate.
Step 2: Based on this recommendation, the superintendent should approve the change to district transportation policy.
Step 3: The district exceptional student education (ESE) office, with the assistance of the transportation department, should modify the district's ESE manual to include guidelines regarding the use of specialized student transportation.
The guidelines should include examples of situations where the use of specialized student transportation is and is not appropriate.
The guidelines should also require adequate documentation of the necessity of any student who is approved to receive specialized transportation services.
Step 4: The district ESE department should disseminate the revisions to appropriate ESE employees, school employees, and transportation employees and take steps to ensure that Individual Education Plans contain documentation of the need for specialized transportation services.
Step 5: The district ESE office should design and implement an ongoing monitoring program to ensure compliance with the guidelines.
Transportation managers, exceptional student education (ESE) program manager, and superintendent.
August 2003
Who is Responsible Time Frame
Action Plan 12-9 Obtain Medicaid Reimbursement for Transporting Eligible Exceptional Students Strategy Action Needed District to apply for Medicaid reimbursement for transportation provided to Medicaideligible exceptional education students.
Step 1: The chief financial officer should obtain billing information on Medicaidreimbursable transportation expenses and set up a system to bill Medicaid for these expenses.
Step 2: The chief financial officer, with the assistance of the transportation manager, should collect data necessary to bill Medicaid for reimbursable transportation expenses and bill Medicaid for these expenses.
Chief financial officer, transportation program manager Medicaid billing system to be operational by the beginning of school year 2003-04.
Who is Responsible Time Frame Source: OPPAGA.
12-22
OPPAGA
Student Transportation
6
The district acts promptly and appropriately in response to accidents.
The transportation department takes various steps to prevent and minimize problems arising from accidents Given the amount of time school buses are on the road each school day, it is almost inevitable that they will be involved in accidents.
All school districts are required to report bus accidents involving $500 or more damage to the Florida Department of Education.
The St. Lucie County School District had 46 accidents involving its school buses during school year 2000-01.
Of these accidents, bus drivers were responsible for 17 and other drivers were responsible for 24.
4 Accidents ranged in severity from minor damage to $9,800 in damages.
The district helps prevent accidents by requiring bus drivers to conduct pre-trip inspections prior to all bus runs.
Drivers document the inspections on written forms, which they turn in each week, and report any problems to shop foremen for repairs.
To ensure that drivers are reporting all problems, the shop foremen spot-check the forms.
Transportation managers also periodically observe the pre-trip inspections of the buses at the bus compounds.
The district has disciplined drivers for not conducting the pre-trip inspections.
The district has taken various preparations in order to minimize additional problems arising from accidents.
All buses on routes and field trips are equipped with two-way radios that are monitored by dispatchers from 4:30 a.m. until 6:00 p.m. on school days.
Transportation supervisors (area managers and transportation managers), vehicle maintenance foremen, the routing section, and the district security office also monitor bus radio transmissions.
Bus drivers conduct bus evacuation drills that principals observe and coordinate each semester.
The district has procedures employees are to use when bus accidents occur.
These procedures direct specific transportation employees (e.g., supervisors, the safety specialist, and district security officers) what actions to take when they find out that a bus has been involved in an accident or other emergency.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
None, as the school district meets this best practice.
7
The district needs to strengthen its efforts to ensure that students behave appropriately on buses and it should take action to identify and seek reimbursement from students who vandalize buses.
District policies guide student discipline actions The district annually adopts codes of student conduct for elementary and secondary schools.
Included in these codes are rules governing the conduct of students while walking to or from or waiting at district bus stops and while traveling on district buses.
The codes establish four levels of infractions and a variety of disciplinary responses.
For example, a level one school bus infraction such as refusing to obey driver 4
The responsible party was not documented in the reports of the remaining five accidents.
OPPAGA
12-23
Student Transportation instructions can result in discipline ranging from a driver/student conference to the loss of bus riding privileges from 1 to 10 days.
A level four school bus infraction such as an intentional threat to use deadly force against a bus driver can result in suspension from the bus for the remainder of the semester along with a mandatory parental conference with transportation and a school administrator.
To help bus drivers facing discipline problems on their buses, district drivers receive in-service training from the district on how to maintain bus discipline.
Board policy requires that bus drivers submit written school bus incident reports of student misconduct to school principals.
The district transportation office periodically schedules conferences between parents, bus drivers, and other appropriate district employees to help resolve perceived discipline problems on buses.
Despite the training they receive, bus drivers still have disciplinary problems some of which involve vandalism to school buses.
The vandalism ranges from pornographic graffiti to destruction of bus seat covers and protective safety foam.
A weakness in school board policy is that it does not require principals to assess restitution of damage repair costs due to vandalism of a school bus.
Instead, principals are allowed to administer disciplinary responses such as changing the student's seat on the bus or giving the student a verbal warning.
In Fiscal Year 2001-02, the school bus vandalism cost the district $138,624.
According to district employees, bus drivers frequently cannot identify perpetrators of many incidences of vandalism, which makes collecting restitution impossible.
While identifying perpetrators can be difficult, other school districts attempt to reduce vandalism though the use of required assigned seating on buses, requiring bus drivers to check for vandalism in their bus at the end of each tier of a bus route, and the use of video cameras to monitor student activities while in transit.
If, by taking more active approach to identifying perpetrators of vandalism and seeking restitution for the damages they cause, the district halved its uncompensated damage from school bus vandalism, it could reduce its costs by up to $69,000 a year.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
We recommend that the transportation department take actions to reduce vandalism and the unreimbursed costs associated with it by taking actions such as improving the identification of vandals on buses by using required assigned seat policies, requiring that bus drivers check the insides of buses after each tier of a bus route for vandalism, and increasing the use of video cameras.
Action plan 12-10 provides the steps needed to implement this recommendation.
Action Plan 12-10 Actions to Identify Reduce Vandalism on Buses and Associated Unreimbursed Costs Strategy Action Needed The district takes action to reduce bus vandalism and increase collection of restitution for bus damage.
Step 1: The superintendent should recommend a policy to the school board that requires principals to assess restitution and attempt to collect restitution when students vandalize school buses.
The policy should specify actions principals and the transportation department should take when restitution is not paid.
Step 2: The board should review and adopt the recommended policy.
12-24
OPPAGA
Student Transportation Transportation managers should review the effectiveness of current procedures and techniques other districts use to reduce vandalism on buses.
Based on this review, transportation managers should identify improved methods and techniques to prevent bus vandalism and associated unreimbursed costs.
Step 4: Transportation managers should implement the improved methods of reducing vandalism on buses and the associated unreimbursed costs.
Step 5: Transportation managers and the finance department should periodically review the district's cost to repair damage from bus vandalism and the amount of restitution it collects for this damage and, if needed, recommend any other changes necessary to reduce school bus vandalism costs.
Transportation managers, principals, superintendent, school board August 2003 Step 3:
Who is Responsible Time Frame Source: OPPAGA.
Bus Acquisition and Maintenance
8
The district has taken action to minimize the number of spare buses it maintains, but needs to establish a bus replacement policy.
The district uses standard bus procurement and retirement practices The transportation department in the St. Lucie County school system uses standard practices for the procurement and retirement of buses.
Transportation department employees annually determine how many buses need to be replaced by examining bus records for factors such as high mileage and operating costs.
The district orders buses through the Florida Department of Education's bus purchasing pool.
Transportation employees inspect all buses prior to placing them in service and assign newer buses to longer routes.
Buses being replaced are declared surplus equipment and turned over to district purchasing for sale at auction.
The district receives between $350 and $3,750 per bus at auction.
The district has reduced its spare bus inventory In 2002, the St. Lucie County School District had a high percentage of spare buses.
In February 2002, the district had had a fleet of 374 buses, 307 (82.1%) regular route buses and 67 (17.9%) spare buses.
Approximately 40 of these spare buses were needed to temporarily replace buses undergoing planned and unplanned maintenance.
In addition, according to district employees, the district needed an additional 8 buses for field trips.
5 This left the district with a surplus of 19 spare buses.
By keeping buses it does not need, the district forgoes the revenue it could receive from their sale.
In addition, since all buses including spares must be maintained in accordance with state standards, maintaining excess spare buses places unnecessary work on vehicle maintenance employees.
District policy prohibits the use of buses for special trips that would "alter, interfere, or interrupt" regular school routes.
However, in recognition that the staggered school start- and end-times leave a small window of time available for field trips, the district does allow some field trips during scheduled bus routes with the buses driven by substitute bus drivers.
5
OPPAGA
12-25
Student Transportation However, since the initiation of this review, the district has reduced the percentage of spare buses in its inventory.
As of January 2003, the district school bus fleet consisted of 379 buses, 333 (87.9%) regular route buses and 46 (12.1%) spares.
Of the spare buses, 4 are damaged and not in service, 35 are used to replace buses undergoing planned or unplanned maintenance, and 7 are used for field trips, or replacements for regular route buses.
The district has not established a bus replacement policy Like all districts, the St. Lucie School District has an ongoing need to replace aging buses.
To retire older buses and meet increases in demand, the transportation department purchased 16 buses at a cost of $944,466 in school year 2001-02 and 29 buses for $1,745,687 in school year 2002-03.
While the district has purchased an average of 24 buses a year over the past 10 years, it has a large number of buses older than 10 years of age.
As can be seen in Exhibit 12-5, as of December, 2002, 134 or 35% of St. Lucie County's bus fleet was 10 years or older.
Exhibit 12-5
In December 2002, the St. Lucie County School District's Bus Fleet Has Many Buses 10 Years Old and Older Age in Years 12 11 10 9 8 7 6 5 4 3 2 1 
Number of Buses 64 70 0 25 26 24 22 25 34 26 18 16 29 379
Percentage of Total 17% 18% 0% 7% 7% 7% 6% 7% 9% 7% 5% 4% 8% 100%
An essential element for the operation of a school bus fleet is to ensure that buses within the fleet are replaced on a regular basis.
Establishment of replacement schedules for equipment allows entities to budget for and replace equipment in an orderly manner.
The St. Lucie County School District has not established such a policy.
While exhibit 12-5 above shows that district bought buses in most years, it also shows the district did not replaced buses on a set schedule.
In the past, the Florida Department of Education (FDOE) has recommended a 10-year replacement cycle for all public school buses in the state.
However, FDOE no longer recommends a specific time frame in which school buses should be replaced.
St. Lucie County School District transportation department employees are considering recommending that the board adopt a 10-year bus replacement schedule for the district, but decided to wait for new state guidelines.
Daily mileage and road conditions can affect the useful life of buses.
For example, travel on unpaved or unimproved roads causes more stress on buses, which reduces their useful life.
St. Lucie County buses used in daily route service travel an average of 20,573 miles per year for regular buses.
ESE buses travel
12-26
OPPAGA
Student Transportation an average of 22,349 miles per year.
Approximately 12% of the roads buses in St. Lucie County are unpaved.
Many Florida school districts are successfully using bus replacement schedules that range from 12 to 15 years.
St. Lucie County is currently essentially using a 12-year replacement cycle as evidenced by the age of bus found in Exhibit 12-5.
If the district sets a formal 12-year replacement schedule, it will need to replace 209 buses over the next five years.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
We recommend that the transportation department recommend a bus replacement schedule to the school board and that the board adopt a formal a school bus replacement policy.
Action Plan 12-11 provides the steps needed to implement this recommendation.
Action Plan 12-11 Establish Bus Replacement Policy Strategy Action Needed School district to establish a bus replacement policy.
Step 1: Transportation managers, with the assistance of the vehicle maintenance manager, should conduct a study using district data and professional judgment, to determine the optimal life cycle of buses operated in St. Lucie County.
The study and its recommendations would be presented to the superintendent.
Step 2: The superintendent should recommend a bus replacement policy for school board approval.
Step 3: Once board approval is received, yearly bus purchases should be made in accordance with this policy.
Transportation managers, vehicle maintenance manager, superintendent, school board.
July 2003
Who Is Responsible Time Frame Source: OPPAGA.
9
The district provides timely routine servicing for buses and other district vehicles and responds promptly to breakdowns and other unforeseen contingencies.
Bus inspections comply with rules State-required bus inspections are the foundation for most bus-related repair work.
The state currently requires districts to inspect buses on a 20-day cycle, but is considering allowing districts to extend this schedule up to 30 days.
These inspections cover all major operating and safety systems.
District shop foremen schedule the inspections in advance for the entire school year and distribute inspection schedules to shop employees, area managers, and bus drivers.
Inspection notices on bus dashboards remind drivers of scheduled bus inspections.
If a bus misses its scheduled inspection, fleet maintenance employees notify area managers, who then notify drivers of the required inspections.
Buses that are not in compliance with the 20-day inspection regulations have tags placed on the windshield to notify drivers that the bus is not to be driven without permission from fleet maintenance employees.
OPPAGA 12-27
Student Transportation Transportation vehicle maintenance employees inspect buses at the district's south bus compound, as other bus facilities in the district are not equipped to conduct these inspections.
6 For buses that are stored in locations other than the south bus compound, the bus drivers come into the bus facility after their bus runs and receive a spare bus for use while their buses are being serviced.
Transportation employees file bus inspection records in individual bus files in the shop foremen/vehicle maintenance administration areas.
A Department of Education review of bus records in April 2000 showed that the district complied with the laws and rules requiring 20-day bus inspections.
OPPAGA observations indicated that vehicle maintenance foremen frequently "walk the floor" of the south bus compound observing inspections and repairs to ensure quality.
Vehicle maintenance employees appear to be well organized and carry out their jobs efficiently.
The district effectively tracks and handles vehicle repairs The district has effective procedures for responding to bus breakdowns and accidents.
The transportation department documents locations of breakdowns, when the maintenance technician was dispatched, the nature of the problem, when the bus driver was back on the road, and when the technician was back at the shop.
The district reports that it had 291 service calls in school year 2000-01 for the 7,087,488 miles the buses traveled during this period (4.1 service calls per 100,000 miles).
These service calls range from vehicle collision damage to electrical problems on a bus.
The vehicle maintenance employees do not have formal guidelines to assist them on making costeffective decisions regarding whether to make expensive repairs on older buses or to retire the buses needing these repairs.
However, the vehicle service manager reports using an informal practice of looking at the cost of the repairs and, if the cost is more than $400 or fleet averages, examining the vehicle's records to determine whether the repairs are cost-effective.
The district tracks bus inspections and repairs using an automated maintenance program that the district obtained from a bus vendor.
The district is currently working with the maintenance program's vendor to allow an automated 20-day inspection cycle instead of the 30-day inspection cycle presently built into the system.
The only cost, performance, and operational data that the system is unable to supply is fuelrelated information.
The district is in the process of completing the fueling system to allow fueling information to be automatically input into the vehicle maintenance system.
Vehicle maintenance employees do not provide or track the routine maintenance performed for district vehicles other than school buses.
In the past, maintenance employees reportedly took up to four days to service non-school bus vehicles.
The district now contracts out maintenance of these vehicles to an area auto dealer who charges the district a $50-per-hour labor rate and keeps an open rack (repair space) for district vehicles.
The departments owning these non-school bus vehicles are responsible for the upkeep these vehicles.
In those cases where the vehicle maintenance employees do provide repairs to non-school bus vehicles, the vehicle maintenance function bills for work performed and is reimbursed by the appropriate department.
Innovative oil program saves district funds The district has a preventive maintenance program to provide timely routine servicing of its bus fleet.
District mechanics replace mileage-based service items such as coolant and fuel filters at the time of the 20-day bus inspection that is closest to the recommended replacement mileage.
6
In January 2003, District personnel reported that two bays in the north county transportation compound are again being used to perform routine bus inspections.
12-28
OPPAGA
Student Transportation The district has established an innovative program to eliminate routine oil changes.
The district uses engine oil that meets and/or exceeds the engine manufacturer's specifications, but needs to be changed only when indicated by an oil analysis taken every 9,000 miles of travel.
7 The oil manufacturer has given the district a product warranty that backs up all failures that are caused by its product.
The district estimates that extending the mileage between oil changes has reduced labor costs and the amount of used oil that needs to be stored and disposed according to hazardous waste guidelines.
District employees say that the superior lubricating qualities of the oil have increased the fleet fuel efficiency from 7.54 miles per gallon to 7.89 miles per gallon, thus saving the district approximately $15,000 per year.
The School Transportation Management section of the Florida Department of Education has reviewed St. Lucie's information and believes that this oil system will save the district money each year.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
We recommend that the district establish formal guidelines to assist the vehicle maintenance service manager in making cost-effective decisions on whether to make expensive repairs on older buses.
Action Plan 12-12 provides the steps needed to implement this recommendation.
Action Plan 12-12 Vehicle Repair Guidelines Strategy Action Needed Establish formal vehicle repair guidelines.
Step 1: Transportation managers, with the assistance of the vehicle maintenance service manager, should evaluate repairs performed in the 2002-2003 school year.
This evaluation will be used to establish vehicle repair guidelines to assist the vehicle maintenance service manager make cost-effective decisions on whether to make expensive repairs on older buses.
Step 2: These guidelines should be periodically updated.
Transportation managers and the vehicle maintenance service manager.
August 2003
Who is Responsible Time Frame Source: OPPAGA.
10
The district ensures that fuel purchases are cost-effective and that school buses and other vehicles are efficiently supplied with fuel.
District fueling system is effective but needs additional security The district transportation department controls the district's fueling system.
Fuel is obtained via a cooperative bid for the Indian River, Okeechobee, and St. Lucie school districts.
The district has two fueling facilities: one in the southern compound has 20,000-gallon diesel tank and a 10,000-gallon gasoline tank and one north compound has two 10,000-gallon diesel tanks and a 7,500-gallon gasoline tank.
7
Normal oil is changed at a set interval, such as every 15,000 miles.
OPPAGA
12-29
Student Transportation Under established procedures, the district orders additional fuel when gasoline tanks are at 500 gallons residual and diesel tanks at 8,500 gallons residual.
In emergency situations such as hurricane alerts, the district keeps fuel tanks full to allow buses to be used as part of the county's established emergency evacuation system.
The fueling system is not automated.
If they are available, attendants fuel both buses and other district vehicles.
Otherwise, drivers fuel the vehicles.
Attendants or drivers enter the amount of fuel taken, the vehicle's assigned number, and its odometer reading in log books.
District employees expect that the district will have the fueling system fully automated in the near future.
Currently, security at the fueling facilities consists of security cameras, fences, and locked attendant's doors (locked except during 5 a.m. and 6 p.m. on weekdays).
Several district employees have keys to the attendant's doors to allow for after-hours and weekend fueling.
However, transportation employees do not routinely review video tapes showing the fueling islands to ensure that only district vehicles use the facilities.
Instead transportation department employees take daily stick readings of tank contents and compare them to log information to check the accuracy and usage of the system.
If they find a variance of 50 or more gallons in a three-day period, they then verify the fuel charge-out records (fueling logs) against fuel pumped.
However this system may not detect all unauthorized use of fuel.
Since most vehicles have fuel tanks substantially less than 50 gallons in capacity, it is possible that a non-district sedan or a pickup truck could fuel without being detected.
District employees expect that full implementation of the automated fueling system will eliminate these security concerns.
The Florida Department of Environmental Protection inspection records indicate no environmental problems with district fueling facilities.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
None, as the district will meet this best practice with the completion of the automated fueling system.
11
The district has conveniently located and secure transportation facilities.
Transportation facilities are appropriately located and equipped The St. Lucie County School District has transportation facilities in the West Port St. Lucie area (south bus compound), the Fort Pierce area (north bus compound) and the north Fort Pierce area (Westwood High School).
All the compounds are fenced and lighted and have parking for all buses that are not in use.
South compound employees perform all bus inspections and most repairs, with north compound employees performing only minor repairs such as replacing light bulbs.
The south bus compound vehicle service center is a comprehensive, covered 8-service-bay facility.
The north bus compound has two service bays but they are unused.
The district is currently conducting a study to evaluate renovating the north bus compound service bays for use in bus inspections.
8
8
In January 2003, District personnel reported that two bays in the north county transportation compound are again being used when perform routine bus inspections.
If any repairs are required as a result of routine inspection, the bus is taken to the South County repair facility.
12-30
OPPAGA
Student Transportation The south bus compound vehicle service center's floor layout appears to be appropriate.
The facility has safety apparatus such as fire extinguishers, eye washes, and emergency showers.
The facility also houses transportation maintenance and operational employees and associated files.
The district has established procedures to deal with hazardous wastes generated at the service center.
Antifreeze and used oil filters are collected and placed in labeled hazardous waste drums.
Waste oil is collected and placed in a labeled used oil tank.
When the drums or tank are full, the shop foremen call a specialized environmental company who is under contract to pick up these items and safely dispose their contents.
The south bus compound vehicle service center is equipped with a parts room.
The rooms contain a limited amount of parts such as a few tires, light bulbs, and an alternator.
The district has two employees dedicated to acquiring and distributing bus repair parts and supplies.
Access to the parts room is limited to the parts men and shop foremen (shop foremen have access when parts employees are unable to be physically present in the shop).
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
None, as the district meets this best practice.
12
The district has a lower maintenance staff-to-vehicle ratio than state guidelines suggest, but provides them with professional development opportunities.
The district's vehicle maintenance staffing level is lower than state guidelines The transportation department The fleet maintenance service maintenance and inspections.
needs 18 technicians to handle currently employs 14 technicians to maintain the district's school bus fleet.
manager said that additional technicians are needed to perform necessary According to a Florida Department of Education spreadsheet, St. Lucie the present workload of 379 buses, an increase of 4 technicians.
However, DOE may be changing the current inspection standards.
The current standard requires buses to be inspected every 20 days, but DOE is considering modifying its rules to allow up to 30 days between inspections.
This would effectively reduce the district's inspection workload by 50%, and could allow it to better meet workload demands with its current staffing level.
The district encourages maintenance employees to improve their job skills The school district provides training opportunities and financial incentives to encourage vehicle maintenance technicians to improve their job skills.
In the past, selected mechanics attend Florida Association for Pupil Transportation (FAPT) bus repair classes in the summertime; however, this training has been eliminated due to district budgetary constraints.
The district also provides training through periodic in-service sessions.
One of the district's foremen who is a certified bus inspector trainer provides training to all new technicians employed by the district, enabling these employees to become certified as state inspectors.
The district reimburses technicians who successfully take the National Institute for Automotive Service Excellence (ASE) tests for the costs they incur to travel to and take the test.
It also requires its technicians to successfully complete the test before they can qualify for a position as a district certified school bus technician.
OPPAGA
12-31
Student Transportation Bus technicians who own and use a full complement of tools in performing their assigned duties are allowed to use an annual one-time purchase order of up to $285 per year to cover tool loss, "wear and tear", theft, and breakage.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
We recommend that the district review number of technicians if the state modifies its bus inspection requirements.
Action Plan 12-13 provides the steps needed to implement this recommendation.
Action Plan 12-13 Determine the Number of Technicians Needed Strategy Action Needed Determine the number of technicians needed if the state modifies bus inspection requirements.
Step 1: After DOE issues new inspections guidelines, the district should determine the number of technicians it needs to meet the bus maintenance workload.
Step 2: If a change in the number of technicians is appropriate, transportation managers should make a recommendation to the district superintendent for action.
Step 3: If resources are available, the superintendent should recommend that the board authorize the hiring of additional vehicle technicians if needed.
Transportation managers Dependent on changes in the vehicle maintenance workload
Who is Responsible Time Frame Source: OPPAGA.
13
The district maintains a cost-effective inventory of parts, supplies, and equipment for its transportation department.
Parts inventories are adequate in size and appropriately obtained The St. Lucie County School District has one transportation parts room located in the south county bus compound.
The parts manager and his assistant staff the parts room using overlapping shifts covering the time period of 5 a.m. to 6 p.m. during school workdays.
Access to the parts room is restricted to the parts room employees and shop foremen (just for those times when parts room employees are unavailable).
The district properly inventories and accounts for vehicle parts.
Transportation employees check new parts to ensure that they are correct, properly priced, and of appropriate quality.
Parts coming into district parts rooms are properly inventoried and accounted for.
They also check parts such as alternators that private vendors rebuild or service.
The transportation department keeps its parts inventory on a computerized perpetual inventory program.
Annual audits of the parts rooms show that little inventory is unaccounted for.
For example, the parts inventory taken in June 2001 showed five errors in the 1913 line items inventoried with only one of these items being "short" with the shortage totaling $1.19 on an inventory of $202,000.
12-32
OPPAGA
Student Transportation The district transportation parts room has relatively small amounts of inventory on hand.
This can be attributed to use of "just in time" inventory practices and the return of unneeded items.
The transportation parts computer system generates on-hand reports and reorder reports daily to assist parts employees in reordering items based on pre-determined minimum-maximum ("Min-Max") reorder points.
The district returns parts that it no longer needs to vendors for credit.
As the district continues to standardize its bus fleet, the transportation parts operation is able to continue to reduce the amount of inventory on hand.
The district obtains parts and supplies in an economical manner.
District purchasing employees works with transportation employees to obtain necessary parts while minimizing costs.
The district solicits bids from local and distant companies to supply items such as rebuilt alternators.
The St. Lucie County Chamber of Commerce has recognized that the district's transportation parts operation was very supportive of doing business locally but also had to spend the taxpayers' dollars in the most economic fashion.
Service items such as towing contracts are also bid out.
The district uses state contracts to obtain parts and supplies when appropriate.
Observations and discussions with fleet maintenance employees indicate that warranty information is tracked with warranty claims made as appropriate.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
The district meets this best practice.
Managerial Oversight
14
The district provides appropriate technological and computer support for student transportation functions and operations.
Transportation operations have adequate computer support The transportation department has a number of computer systems that assist it in conducting operations.
The district uses one system for all district financial record keeping and budgeting.
As previously described, the transportation department has computerized maintenance and parts systems; a timekeeping system to assist in the logging in of bus drivers and ensuring accurate time sheets, and a system for bus routing.
As previously discussed, it plans to automate the vehicle fueling system in the near future.
Some functions such as the tracking of substance abuse testing records and personnel performance are not computerized.
At present, it appears to be appropriate that these functions are done manually.
There appears to be adequate levels of coordination between the district's transportation and management information systems departments.
This coordination is not done on a formal basis but is a continuous dialogue.
OPPAGA
12-33
Student Transportation
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
The district meets this best practice.
15
The district has a reasonable accountability system for student transportation but could improve it.
The district has established goals, measurable objectives, and strategies for student transportation In its strategic plan, the St. Lucie County School District has established three goals for its student transportation program.
· · · Goal 1 ­ Goal 2 ­ available Goal 3 ­ needs of School transportation services will be provided safely and reliably.
Transportation services will be provided to all eligible students efficiently and within budget allocations.
Transportation employees are well-trained, highly qualified, and motivated to meet the the district.
The plan also contains measurable objectives and associated strategies for each goal.
For example, the objective for goal 1 is to reduce the number of accidents involving student or passenger injury by 5% and associated strategies include training drivers in behavioral management and purchasing video cameras.
In addition, the transportation department has a more detailed plan containing additional objectives and strategies.
The transportation objectives and strategies address three major aspects of transportation efficiency and effectiveness: safety, efficiency, and staff development.
However, the objectives do not address one other major aspect of the program, service timeliness.
Objectives for service timeliness could include the percentage of students whose travel time is at or below district standards, or the percentage of times buses operate on schedule.
Related strategies could include reducing driver absenteeism, recruiting and retaining substitute drivers, inspecting buses according to schedule, or reducing unplanned bus maintenance.
The district compares selected transportation performance data to data of peer districts The district has identified other Florida school districts it considers to be peers and exemplars against which it can compare its performance.
The district compared its performance to that of peer districts on three measures: cost per mile, average bus occupancy, and staffing ratios.
In the first measure (cost per mile), the district compared itself to 20 different peer districts.
These districts ranged from Calhoun to Polk county school districts.
In the remaining two measures (average bus occupancy and staffing ratios), the district compared itself to six districts each (a total of eight different districts).
However, the district may be able to obtain more useful information if it used transportation characteristics such as number of miles driven to identify a standard set of peer districts looked at additional measures such as the such as percentage of state/local funding and percentage of number of non-eligible students transported.
12-34
OPPAGA
Student Transportation Transportation performance is routinely reported to senior employees and the superintendent School transportation managers provide senior employees and the superintendent with regular updates of the performance of the department on its goal and objectives.
In addition, district progress on transportation goals will be assessed by peer committees as part of a districtwide performance assessment.
(See discussion in Chapter 4, Performance Accountability).
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
We recommend that the school transportation department establish objectives and related strategies concerning the timeliness of transportation services.
Action Plan 12-14 provides the steps needed to implement this recommendation.
Action Plan 12-14 Develop Objectives and Strategies on Timeliness of Transportation Services Strategy Action Needed Develop objectives and strategies related to the timeliness of student transportation.
Step 1: Transportation managers should determine which objectives to use for service timeliness and the strategies related to those objectives.
Step 2: Transportation managers shall recommend one or more objectives and strategies related to service timeliness to the superintendent for inclusion in the district's strategic plan.
Step 3: The superintendent will recommend that the board include the objectives and strategies in the strategic plan, and the board will include the objective and strategies in the plan.
Step 4: Transportation managers will provide district administrators and the school board an annual "report card" that shows actual performance for all selected performance and cost-efficiency measures in comparison with standards or the performance of peer districts.
Transportation managers, superintendent, school board July 2003 and annually thereafter
Who is Responsible Time Frame Source: OPPAGA.
16
The district coordinates transportation planning with other departments and community entities but does not provide the board with sufficient options on how changes in policies would affect transportation expenditures.
No regular and systematic financial analysis of transportation needs and priorities Although the transportation department coordinates its budget needs with other departments within the school district, it does not routinely provide the superintendent and board with a systematic assessment of student transportation policy options and areas of potential cost savings.
Assessment of student transportation policy options should include discontinuing bus service to students who are not eligible for state funding and can safely walk to school, reducing the number of spare buses, realigning routes, and OPPAGA 12-35
Student Transportation reviewing the types of buses purchased.
The transportation department should also work with the finance department to develop and present to the school board information on the transportation and other cost implications of board decisions regarding education programs such as school choice and magnet schools, charter schools, exceptional education programs, and transporting students who do not meet the state transportation criteria.
Consulting with others on areas impacting student transportation Transportation employees have been involved in planning for decisions such as the location of the bus ramp at Dan McCarty Middle School and the future growth plans of the district.
Transportation employees also communicate regularly with school district security officers and school resource officers on student loading and unloading issues.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
We recommend that the school transportation program, as part to the annual budget development process, review current and planned future operations to identify areas of potential cost savings.
This information should be presented to the superintendent and the school board.
Action Plan 12-15 provides the steps needed to implement this recommendation.
Action Plan 12-15 Develop and Present Information on Potential Cost Savings from Policy Changes Strategy Action Needed Develop and present information on areas of potential cost savings as part of budget process.
Step 1: Transportation managers should review current and planned future operations to identify areas of potential cost savings.
Areas of potential savings include eliminating transportation services to courtesy bus riders, reducing the number of spare buses, realigning bus routes to increase efficiency and effectiveness, changing transportation staffing, and reviewing the types of buses and equipment purchased.
Step 2: Transportation managers will present projected cost savings including the pros and cons of each option that decision makers can use to make informed decisions during budget discussions.
Step 3: This information will be presented annually to the superintendent, and school board.
Transportation managers, selected transportation employees, chief financial officer, superintendent, and school board.
May 2004 and annually thereafter as part of the budget process
Who is Responsible Time Frame Source: OPPAGA.
12-36
OPPAGA
Student Transportation
17
The district monitors the fiscal condition of student transportation functions by regularly analyzing expenditures and reviewing them against the budget.
Generally adequate district fiscal monitoring The transportation department generally monitors its expenditures in an adequate manner.
Transportation employees review expenditures on a regular basis with the exception of expenditures involving workers' compensation, utilities, and maintenance of facilities as these expenditures are not included in the district transportation budget.
Budget amendments are made as necessary and coordinated with the district finance department.
The vehicle maintenance manager regularly tracks vehicle maintenance repairs and costs to identify maintenance cost concerns that can adversely impact district student transportation maintenance and operations.
Transportation managers regularly monitor payroll costs including any overtime, field trips, and training hours.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
None, as the district meets this best practice.
18
The district provides the Florida Department of Education with regular, accurate, and timely counts the number of students it transports.
The transportation department performs student counts The school district surveys the number of students riding its buses through sample counts conducted during October and February of each school year.
The district sends these counts to the Florida Department of Education for use in determining the state funds the district will receive for student transportation.
The district transportation employees notify bus drivers via memos of the actual student count days and instructions on how to fill out the forms.
A sample of a correctly completed student count form is included in the driver handbook.
To increase the number of students riding the buses during weeks in which student counts will be taken, the transportation department will contact schools to lift bus suspensions during those weeks.
The transportation area managers review all completed count sheets for accuracy.
Routing personnel and transportation managers randomly conduct additional reviews of the completed count sheets to ensure accuracy.
The completed sheets are used to adjust bus routes as necessary to improve bus utilization.
The most recent Auditor General report dealing with this subject (dated July 25, 2000) found discrepancies that did not materially affect the district's compliance with the provisions of the Florida Education Finance Program.
These discrepancies included reporting some prekindergarten students in the wrong ridership category and students reported in the two miles or more ridership category but lived less than two miles from school.
OPPAGA
12-37
Student Transportation
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
None, as the district meets this best practice.
19
While some of the fleet maintenance functions are outsourced, the district has not systematically reviewed the prospect for privatizing all student transportation functions such as transportation of students or the fleet maintenance operation.
Selected maintenance repairs are privatized While some of the fleet maintenance functions are outsourced to private vendors, the St. Lucie school transportation program has not systematically reviewed the prospect of privatizing all student transportation functions, including such functions as the driving of regular school bus routes and all maintenance operations associated with school buses.
District transportation managers have not systematically broken down operations into functions, nor have they considered certain costs such as utilities, maintenance, and unemployment compensation when determining the full cost of its student transportation.
Without this information, the district cannot establish reliable cost information for the each of the various student transportation functions that compose the St. Lucie County student transportation system.
Reliable unit cost data would enable the district to compare its in-house costs to those of private vendors and determine whether privatization would be desirable.
The district currently contracts out certain vehicle maintenance functions such as the rebuilding of transmissions and alternators, towing and wrecker services, glass repair, radiator work, and tire mounting and balancing.
It also contracts for charter bus service.
The district contracts out maintenance on district vehicles other than school buses.
The decisions to contract out these services resulted from the review of in-house capabilities and cost versus the cost to outsource these services.
Vendors are selected based on bid comparisons, warranties, and experience with the quality of services provided by various vendors.
Vehicle maintenance foremen check the quality of the services received to ensure standards are met.
The district should systematically review its functions after establishing reliable unit cost information to determine which additional functions, if any, would be beneficial to privatize.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
We recommend that the school transportation program review all school transportation functions every five years to determine if the district could save money and/or improve service quality by privatizing selected transportation functions.
Action Plan 12-16 provides the steps needed to implement this recommendation.
Action Plan 12-16 Review Transportation Functions for Privatization Opportunities Strategy Review student transportation functions every five years to determine if the district could save money and/or improve service quality by privatizing selected transportation functions.
12-38
OPPAGA
Student Transportation Action Needed Transportation managers, with the assistance of transportation employees, should divide the district's student transportation operation into functions such as school bus routing, operation (driving) of school buses, and vehicle maintenance and sub-functions such as operation of school buses on regular bus runs, operation of school buses on field trips, oil changes, and bus inspections.
Step 2: Assigned transportation employees should, with the assistance of district financial employees, determine the full and marginal cost of the district performing the function and sub-functions identified above and the quality level of the service Step 3: Assigned transportation employees, with the assistance of district purchasing employees, will contact appropriate vendors or other districts to determine the probable cost of having private vendors perform various transportation functions and sub-functions.
Step 4: Assigned transportation employees will compile and present to transportation managers information comparing the cost of performing transportation functions and sub-functions by district employees versus private contractors.
Step 5: Transportation managers will incorporate this information in budget discussions and reports on the performance of the student transportation program to the superintendent, the school board, and the public.
Transportation managers, assigned transportation employees, assigned district financial employees, assigned district purchasing employees, the superintendent, and the school board.
March 2005 and every five years thereafter Step 1:
Who is Responsible Time Frame Source: OPPAGA.
20
The district periodically reviews the organizational structure and staffing levels of the student transportation program to minimize administrative layers and processes.
The district has a relatively "flat" transportation organizational structure As seen in Exhibit 12-3, student transportation in St. Lucie County School District has a relatively flat organizational structure, with a limited number of management layers.
With a small number of managers, this type of organizational structure emphasizes the personal responsibility and accountability of front line employees.
For example, the only management layer between bus drivers and the director of transportation are the area managers.
Transportation managers have not formally compared the department's organization to that of peer counties; however, St. Lucie's transportation organization does appear to be efficient.
Recommendations ·
____________________________________________
None, as the district meets this best practice.
OPPAGA
12-39
